Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4147.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. As used in sections 1 to 5 of this 2026 Act:
(1)(a) “Employee” means any person, including noncitizens and minors, employed for
remuneration or under any contract of hire, written or oral, express or implied, by an em-
ployer.
(b) “Employee” does not mean any person who volunteers or donates services performed
for no remuneration or without expectation or contemplation of remuneration as the ade-
quate consideration for the services performed for a religious or charitable institution or a
governmental entity.
(2)(a) “Employer” means a person who employs 500 or more employees in this state.
(b) “Employer” does not mean a tribal government.
(3) “Medical assistance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(4) “Medical assistance recipient” means a recipient of medical assistance from any pro-
gram operated by the Oregon Health Authority, including the Cover All People program es-
tablished in ORS 414.231.
(5) “Protected health information” has the meaning given that term in ORS 192.556.
(6) “Tribal government” means:
(a) A tribal government as defined in ORS 181A.940; or
(b) A federally recognized Indian tribe.
SECTION 2. (1) Not later than June 30 of each year, the Oregon Health Authority, in
collaboration with the Department of Human Services and the Employment Department,
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 65

A-Eng. HB 4147
shall submit a report to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to health
care, in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and to the Legislative Fiscal Officer, that in-
cludes the following information for the preceding state fiscal year:
(a) Aggregated statewide information regarding:
(A) The total number of medical assistance recipients who are employees;
(B) The total number of medical assistance recipients who are employees, distributed by:
(i) Employer size;
(ii) Employer industry; and
(iii) Employer region; and
(C) The cost of providing medical assistance to employees.
(b) For state fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2028, analysis of statewide trends
related to the number of medical assistance recipients who are employees, as compared to
earlier years.
(c) For each of the 20 employers with the highest total number of employees who are
medical assistance recipients:
(A) A description of the industry in which the employer does business in this state, using
the North American Industry Classification System code associated with the employer;
(B) The total number of medical assistance recipients who are employees of the em-
ployer; and
(C) The cost of providing medical assistance to the employees of the employer.
(2) A report required under this section:
(a) Must identify or describe employers by industry;
(b) May not include an employer’s name; and
(c) May not include any personally identifiable information or protected health informa-
tion of an employee whose information is included in the report.
(3) The collection, storage and release of health care data and other information under
sections 1 to 5 of this 2026 Act is subject to the privacy regulations of the federal Health
Insurance Portability and Accountability Act.
SECTION 3. The Oregon Health Authority shall publish a report described in section 2
of this 2026 Act on the authority’s website no later than 10 days after the authority submits
the report as required under section 2 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 4. The Oregon Health Authority, the Department of Human Services and the
Employment Department may enter into an interagency agreement for the purposes of
sections 1 to 5 of this 2026 Act. An interagency agreement under this section must include
provisions for:
(1) Good faith cooperation among the authority, the Department of Human Services and
the Employment Department to enable the authority to carry out its duties and responsibil-
ities under law or under the agreement;
(2) The sharing of resources and information necessary for the authority to carry out its
duties and responsibilities under law or under the agreement, to the extent permitted by law;
and
(3) Ensuring the privacy and security of information shared under the agreement.
SECTION 5. The Oregon Health Authority, the Department of Human Services and the
Employment Department may adopt rules necessary to carry out the provisions of sections
1 to 5 of this 2026 Act.
[2]

A-Eng. HB 4147
SECTION 6. (1) Sections 1 to 5 of this 2026 Act become operative on January 1, 2027.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority, the Department of Human Services and the Employ-
ment Department may take any action before the operative date specified in subsection (1)
of this section that is necessary to enable the authority and the departments to exercise, on
and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties,
functions and powers conferred on the authority and the departments by sections 1 to 5 of
this 2026 Act.
SECTION 7. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.

[3]